Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-208. Classification of positions.

There are established for state agencies covered by this subchapter the following classification titles and grades.

The following classification titles with grades indicated are approved for the state classification plan, subject to the appropriation acts for the various state agencies and various institutions affected by this subchapter:

Class Code
Title
Grade
U001U DFA DIRECTOR SE05 U024U DHE DIRECTOR SE05 U033U COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION SE05 U133U DHS EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SE05 G056N OAL GAMING DIRECTOR SE04 U002U DFA DEPUTY DIRECTOR AND CHIEF OF STAFF SE04 U010U ATRS DIRECTOR SE04 U014U APERS DIRECTOR SE04 U035U ADC DIRECTOR SE04 U049U DIRECTOR BANK DEPARTMENT SE04 U053U ADJUTANT GENERAL SE04 U055U AEDC DIRECTOR SE04 U060U DIS DIRECTOR SE04 U064U DIRECTOR STATE POLICE SE04 U128U OAL DIRECTOR SE04 U131U ARK ADJUTANT GENERAL SE04 L002N DEPUTY STATE HEALTH OFFICER SE03 L023N DHS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE03 N003N DFA DEP DIR AND COMMISSIONER OF REVENUE SE03 N007N ADH DEPUTY DIRECTOR ADMIN SE03 N012N DFA DEPUTY DIRECTOR AND CONTROLLER SE03 N164N MILITARY DEPUTY ADJUTANT GENERAL SE03 N221N ARKANSAS STATE HOSPITAL COO SE03 U005U PSC CHAIRMAN SE03 U015U ADEQ DIRECTOR SE03 U016U ADPT DIR PARKS RECREATION & TRAVEL SE03 U019U ADFA EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SE03 U027U DEPUTY COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION SE03 U034U DDSSA DIRECTOR SE03 U037U DWS DIRECTOR SE03 U047U STATE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER SE03 U061U ACE DIRECTOR SE03 U073U DIS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE03 U100U WCC CHAIRMAN SE03 U119U DEPUTY DIRECTOR — PUBLIC HEALTH PROGRAMS SE03 U124U MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL SE03 U132U ARK DEPUTY ADJUTANT GENERAL SE03 A018N DHS CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER SE02 A136C DHS MEDICAID CHIEF FINANCE OFFICER SE02 B017N ADH CHIEF SCIENTIST SE02 D003N STATE CHIEF SECURITY OFFICER SE02 D004N DFA IGS/STATE TECHNOLOGY ADMINISTRATOR SE02 G002N DFA REVENUE CHIEF COUNSEL SE02 N004N DFA REV ASST COMMISSIONER POLICY & LEGAL SE02 N011N DFA CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER SE02 N013N DIS CHIEF OPERATING OFFICER SE02 N028N DFA TAX AUDIT ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N029N DFA TAX ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N030N DFA STATE REVENUE OFFICE ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N031N DFA STATE PROCUREMENT ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N032N DFA STATE PERSONNEL ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N033N DFA ADMINISTRATIVE SVCS ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N034N DFA OCSE ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N035N DFA MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N036N DFA EBD ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N037N DFA DRIVER LICENSE ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N038N DFA BUDGET ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N040N DHS CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER SE02 N042N DFA TAX RESEARCH ADMINISTRATOR SE02 N057N ASP DEPUTY DIRECTOR/LT. COLONEL SE02 N181N DIRECTOR OF MEDICAL SERVICES SE02 N218N ADEQ SENIOR DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE02 N219N DFA ADMINISTRATOR INTERNAL AUDIT SE02 N220N DHS CHIEF ATTORNEY SE02 U007U WCC COMMISSIONER SE02 U008U ADVA DIRECTOR SE02 U018U DAH DIRECTOR SE02 U022U LABOR DIRECTOR SE02 U032U AETN DIRECTOR SE02 U040U SECURITIES COMMISSIONER SE02 U042U INSURANCE CHIEF DEPUTY COMMISSIONER SE02 U052U ABA DIRECTOR SE02 U062U ADC CHIEF DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE02 U072U SECRETARY OF AGRICULTURE SE02 U082U PUBLIC DEF COMM EXEC DIRECTOR SE02 U084U DCC DIRECTOR SE02 U086U BANK ASSISTANT COMMISSIONER SE02 U089U DHE DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE02 U091U PROSECUTOR COORDINATOR SE02 U094U CRIME LAB EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SE02 A024N OAL INTERNAL AUDITOR SE01 D011N ADE DIRECTOR OF INFORMATION SYSTEMS SE01 D012N DFA DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR SE01 E004N ADE DEPUTY COMMISSIONER SE01 G004N DHS CHIEF ATTORNEY SE01 G029N DHS DIRECTOR OF POLICY AND LEGAL SE01 G293C DIS CHIEF GENERAL COUNSEL SE01 M092C DHS DIRECTOR EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION SE01 M093C DHS DIRECTOR OF LEGISLATIVE AFFAIRS SE01 M094C DHS DIR PROVIDER SERVICES & QUALITY CTRL SE01 N005N ADE ASST COMMISSIONER LEARNING SERVICES SE01 N006N ADE ASST COMMISSIONER PUB SCH ACCOUNT SE01 N008N ASST COMMISSIONER RESEARCH & TECHNOLOGY SE01 N009N ASST COMMISSIONER FISCAL & ADMIN SVCS SE01 N010N ASST COMMR EDUC EFFECTIVENESS SE01 N015N ADE DIR PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITIES & TRANS SE01 N018N DHS DEP DIR COUNTY OPERATIONS SE01 N019N DHS DEP DIR BEHAV HLTH SERVICES SE01 N020N DHS DDS COMMISSIONER SE01 N021N DHS DEPUTY DIRECTOR — DCFS SE01 N024N DIRECTOR STUDENT LOAN AUTHORITY SE01 N025N INSURANCE DEPUTY COMMISSIONER INFO SVCS SE01 N026N DHS DEPUTY DIRECTOR OF DYS SE01 N027N DHS DEPUTY DIRECTOR ADULT SERVICES SE01 N210N DHS DIR OF EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION SE01 N211N DHS DIRECTOR OF LEGISLATIVE AFFAIRS SE01 N212N DHS DIR OF PROVIDER SVCS & QLTY CONTROL SE01 N213N ADPT CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER SE01 N214N AEDC EXEC VICE PRESIDENT OF GLOBAL BUS SE01 N215N AEDC EXEC VICE PRESIDENT OF OPERATIONS SE01 N216N ASP LIEUTENANT COLONEL SE01 N217N DFA ADMINISTRATOR SE01 N222N DHS STATE DIRECTOR OF DRUG PREVENTION SE01 U003U STATE FORESTER SE01 U004U PSC COMMISSIONER SE01 U012U REHABILITATION SERVICES COMMISSIONER SE01 U013U ADEM DIRECTOR SE01 U020U DAH ASSISTANT DIRECTOR SE01 U025U HEALTH PERMIT SERVICES DIRECTOR SE01 U029U DEAF SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENT SE01 U030U BLIND SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENT SE01 U031U STATE LIBRARY DIRECTOR SE01 U036U AR APPEALS TRIBUNAL CHAIRMAN SE01 U038U PAROLE BOARD CHAIRMAN SE01 U039U STATE GEOLOGIST SE01 U043U ANRC EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SE01 U044U PLANT BOARD DIRECTOR SE01 U045U OIL & GAS DIRECTOR SE01 U046U WCC CHIEF EXEC OFFICER SE01 U048U ARLPC DIRECTOR SE01 U050U PSC DIRECTOR SE01 U057U DEPUTY DIRECTOR OF AGRICULTURE SE01 U059U AEDC DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE01 U063U AEDC EXEC VP MARKETING & RESEARCH SE01 U065U ACE DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE01 U067U ADPT TOURISM DIVISION DIRECTOR SE01 U068U ADPT PARKS DIVISION DIRECTOR SE01 U069U ACIC DIRECTOR SE01 U070U DWS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE01 U076U DWS WORKFORCE INVESTMENT DIRECTOR SE01 U077U ACE DEPUTY DIRECTOR CAREER & TECH ED SE01 U078U APERS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE01 U079U ATRS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE01 U083U DCC CHIEF DEPUTY DIRECTOR SE01 U085U ACD DIRECTOR SE01 U087U AETN ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR SE01 U092U ETHICS COMMISSION DIRECTOR SE01 U095U MEDICAL BOARD SECRETARY/TREASURER SE01 U096U ASBN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SE01 U101U EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SE01 U105U AEDC DEP DIR FINANCE & ADMINISTRATION SE01 U121U HEALTH INFORMATION TECH DIRECTOR SE01 U125U INSPECTOR GENERAL CHIEF COUNSEL SE01 U134U EXEC DIR AR STATE MEDICAL BD SE01 L001N CRIME LAB DIR MEDICAL EXAMINATION DIV MP10 U026U ADH DIRECTOR MP10 L003N CHIEF PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MP09 L004N CRIME LAB ASSOC MEDICAL EXAMINER MP09 L005N PSYCHIATRIC SPECIALIST MP08 L025N SENIOR PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MP08 N001N DIRECTOR OF PHARMACY BOARD MP08 L008N PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MP07 L015N ASST PHARMACY DIRECTOR MP07 L024N DDSSA MEDICAL SPECIALIST MP07 L007N REHAB MED DIR ALCOHOL REHAB CTR-BENTON MP06 L009N DHS BEHAV HLTH GENERAL PHYSICIAN MP06 L011N DENTIST MP06 L012N DDSSA MEDICAL CONSULTANT MP06 L013N GENERAL PHYSICIAN MP06 L014N DIRECTOR OF PHARMACY MP06 L107C ASBP PHARMACIST INSPECTOR MP06 B004N STATE VETERINARIAN MP05 B143C ADH PUBLIC HEALTH VETERINARIAN MP05 L016N REGISTERED PHARMACIST MP05 L017N DHS ALEXANDER CHIEF PSYCHOLOGIST MP05 L027N DDSSA PSYCHOLOGY SPECIALIST MP05 B005N VETERINARIAN MP04 B009N DFA DOG RACING VETERINARIAN MP04 B019N RACING COMMISSION VETERINARIAN MP04 L001C PSYCHOLOGIST SUPERVISOR MP04 L002C NURSING DIRECTOR MP04 L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER MP04 L104C AGRI LABORATORY COORDINATOR MP04 L105C AHC NURSING DIRECTOR MP04 L106C VETERINARY SPECIALIST MP04 L108C PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT MP04 L003C PSYCHOLOGIST MP03 L006C ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR OF NURSING MP03 L009C NURSE MANAGER MP03 L021N PHYSICAL THERAPIST MP03 L097C ADC PSYCHOLOGIST MP03 L015C CLINICAL SPEECH PATHOLOGIST MP02 L017C ADH AREA NURSING DIRECTOR MP02 L019C REGISTERED NURSE COORDINATOR MP02 L020C NURSING SERVICES UNIT MANAGER MP02 L022C NURSING CLINIC COORDINATOR MP02 L022N OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST MP02 L026C ADH NURSING PROGRAM COORD MP02 L027C REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR MP02 L036C NURSE INSTRUCTOR MP02 L032C REGISTERED NURSE — HOSPITAL MP01 L038C REGISTERED NURSE MP01 L042C SCHOOL SPEECH PATHOLOGIST MP01 L045C AUDIOLOGIST MP01 N206N CHIEF DATA OFFICER IT12 D002N STATE DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR LEAD IT11 D005N DFA IT TECHNICAL SPECIALIST IT11 D013N ATRS ASSOC DIR OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY IT11 D103C ASP CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER IT11 D127C DIS CHIEF OF TECHNOLOGY IT11 D128C DIS DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR IT11 D131C DIS ENTERPRISE CLOUD STRATEGIST IT11 D132C DIS ENTERPRISE CLOUD ARCHITECT IT11 D133C DIS ENTERPRISE CLOUD ENGINEER IT11 D134C DIS ENTERPRISE ARCHITECT IT11 D135C DATA SCIENTIST IT11 N017N ADH CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER IT11 D002C DFA OIS ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR IT10 D006N STATE SYSTEMS ARCHITECT IT10 D007N STATE GEOGRAPHIC INFO OFFICER IT10 D009C DIS OPERATIONS CENTER MANAGER IT10 D010C DATA WAREHOUSE LEAD IT10 D015N APERS DIRECTOR OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY IT10 D028N REGULATORY HEALTH LINK TECH OFFICER IT10 D126C DIS DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR LEAD IT10 D129C ADEQ DIRECTOR OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY IT10 D136C DIS IT PROJECT MANAGER DIRECTOR IT10 D137C DIS NETWORK ARCHITECT IT10 D138C DIS DATA CENTER MANAGER IT10 D001C STATE DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR IT09 D003C STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR LEAD IT09 D005C STATE IT SECURITY ANALYST IT09 D011C DFA ERP SYSTEM MANAGER IT09 D022N IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER IT09 D025N DHS IT SENIOR ENGINEER IT09 D105C ADE STATE NETWORK ENGINEER IT09 D124C IT OPERATIONS CENTER MANAGER IT09 D125C SR. STATE SERVER ADMINISTRATOR IT09 D130C DIS DISASTER RECOVERY MANAGER IT09 D139C DATA ENGINEER IT09 E007N ADE DIRECTOR OF COMPUTER SCIENCE IT09 N178N ARS CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER IT09 D004C STATE NETWORK SUPPORT LEAD IT08 D006C SOFTWARE ENGINEER LEAD IT08 D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER IT08 D008C GIS LEAD IT08 D010N INSURANCE CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFFICER IT08 D012C DATABASE SPECIALIST IT08 D013C BANK IT ADMINISTRATOR IT08 D014C STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR IT08 D021C DFA ERP GROUP LEAD IT08 D023N HIT TECHNICAL DIRECTOR IT08 D029N OAL DEPUTY IT GAMING DIRECTOR IT08 D043C ADEM INFO TECHNOLOGY DIVISIONDIRECTOR
IT08 D094C DCC PROJ & ENTERPRISE PROGRAM MGMT ADMIN IT08 D104C ADE STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR IT08 D123C DB ADMINISTRATOR IT08 V039C DIS IT SOURCING PROJECT MANAGER IT08 D015C STATE NETWORK ENGINEER IT07 D017C INFORMATION SYSTEMS SECURITY SPECIALIST IT07 D024N HIT INTERFACE DEVELOPER IT07 D028C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST IT07 D029C SENIOR GIS ANALYST IT07 D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR IT07 D034C DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR IT07 D035C COMPUTER SUPPORT MANAGER IT07 D110C OAL QA SYSTEMS ANALYST IT07 D112C OAL NETWORK ENGINEER IT07 D113C OAL SR. DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR IT07 D122C IT PROJECT MANAGER IT07 D016C SENIOR TECHNOLOGY ANALYST IT06 D022C SYSTEMS SPECIALIST IT06 D023C STATE SYSTEMS SPECIALIST IT06 D024C STATE NETWORK SPECIALIST IT06 D025C STATE IT SECURITY SPECIALIST IT06 D026C STATE HELP DESK LEAD IT06 D027C SOFTWARE ENGINEER IT06 D033C DFA ERP ANALYST IT06 D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST IT06 D039C NETWORK SUPPORT SPECIALIST IT06 D040C GIS ANALYST IT06 D042C DATA WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST IT06 D049C DIS PROJECT MANAGER IT06 D067C INFORMATION SYSTEMS SECURITY ANALYST IT06 D111C OAL IT SECURITY ANALYST IT06 D121C BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE SPECIALIST IT06 D020C INST INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY COORD IT05 D037C ADE APSCN APPLICATIONS MANAGER IT05 D044C SYSTEMS ANALYST IT05 D045C STATE SYSTEMS ANALYST IT05 D047C INFORMATION SYSTEMS BUSINESS ANALYST IT05 D050C SECURITY ANALYST IT05 D051C SYSTEMS APPLICATIONS SUPERVISOR IT05 D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST IT05 D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR IT05 D056C SYSTEMS COORDINATION ANALYST IT05 D057C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGER IT05 D060C ASST DIR COMPUTER SVCS IT05 D061C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATION SPEC IT05 D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST IT05 D032C DIS IT ASSET MANAGER IT04 D036C AETN WEBSITE COORDINATOR IT04 D055C ADE APSCN FIELD ANALYST IT04 D058C COMPUTER OPERATIONS COORDINATOR IT04 D062C DATABASE ANALYST IT04 D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER IT04 D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST IT04 D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST IT04 D082C NETWORK ANALYST IT04 D119C OAL LEAD COMPUTER OPERATOR IT04 D120C APPLICATION PROGRAM SUPPORT SPECIALIST IT04 D046C STATE PRODUCTION CONTROL SUPERVISOR IT03 D066C DIGITAL BROADCAST SPECIALIST IT03 D069C DIS SCHEDULER IT03 D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST IT03 D075C SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST IT03 D072C ACIC SYSTEMS SUPERVISOR IT02 D078C GIS TECHNICIAN IT02 D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN IT02 D083C DIGITAL BROADCAST TECHNICIAN IT02 D084C COMPUTER OPERATOR IT02 D108C OAL APPLICATION SUPP SPECIALIST IT02 D080C ACIC SYSTEMS SPECIALIST IT01 D089C INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ASSISTANT IT01 D107C OAL COMPUTER OPERATOR IT01 C093C EXTRA HELP ASSISTANT GSMW A002C DFA ASSISTANT ACCOUNTING ADMINISTRATOR GS15 A005N ASST DEPUTY BANK COMMISSIONER GS15 A016N OAL CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER GS15 A019N DHS DEP CHIEF FIN OFFICER — MED SERVICES GS15 A020N DHS DEP CHIEF FIN OFFICER — HUMAN SERVICES GS15 A131C DHS CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER GS15 A132C DIS BUSINESS SERVICES ADMINISTRATOR GS15 B001N ADH SENIOR SCIENTIST GS15 D008N DFA PBAS TECHNICAL SUPPORT MANAGER GS15 E072C DIRECTOR OF COMPUTER SCIENCE AND STEM GS15 G001C DFA ASSISTANT ADMIN SVCS ADMINISTRATOR GS15 G001N ADE LITIGATION ATTORNEY GS15 G003N PSC CHIEF ADMIN LAW JUDGE GS15 G005N WCC CHIEF ADMIN LAW JUDGE GS15 G050N OAL CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL GS15 G051N OAL SALES DIRECTOR GS15 G052N ANRC DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS15 G053N DHS DEP DIR LEGISLATIVE AFFAIRS GS15 G279C ABC ADMINISTRATION DIRECTOR GS15 G280C ABC ENFORCEMENT DIRECTOR GS15 G281C ADE POLICY & SPECIAL PROJECTS DIRECTOR GS15 G282C DHS CHIEF LEGISLATIVE AFFAIRS DIRECTOR GS15 G283C DHS CHIEF SECURITY & COMPLIANCE OFFICER GS15 G284C DHS EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION DIRECTOR GS15 G285C DIS GENERAL COUNSEL GS15 G286C DMS DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS15 G287C RACING COMMISSION DIRECTOR GS15 N002N DHE SENIOR ASSOC DIRECTOR GS15 N014N INSURANCE DEP COMMISS FINANCIAL REGS GS15 N016N DHS DEP DIR ADMINISTRATIVE SVCS GS15 N039N ADC DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS15 N047N ADE APSCN DIRECTOR GS15 N061N AEDC BUSINESS FINANCE DIRECTOR GS15 N062N AEDC BUSINESS DEV DIV DIR GS15 N067N ADEQ DEPUTY DIRECTOR — LAND RESOURCES GS15 N070N WCC ASST CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER GS15 N084N AEDC EXEC VP MARKETING & COMMUNICATIONS GS15 N113N ATC DIRECTOR GS15 N125N DHS DEP DIR SVCS FOR THE BLIND GS15 N175N DHS DDS ASST DIR FOR RESIDENTIAL SVCS GS15 N195N ADEQ DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS15 N197N NURSING HOME DIVISION DIRECTOR GS15 N201N DEPUTY COMM OF CRIMINAL INVESTIGATIONS GS15 N207N CHIEF PRIVACY OFFICER GS15 N209N DIRECTOR CLEST GS15 N225N AEDC DIRECTOR, STRATEGIC SUPPORT SVCS GS15 P006N DFA DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATIONS GS15 R001C DFA ASSISTANT PERSONNEL ADMINISTRATOR GS15 R002C DFA ASSISTANT BUDGET ADMINISTRATOR GS15 R003C DFA ASSISTANT EBD ADMINISTRATOR GS15 R048C DHS CHIEF HUMAN RESOURCES OFFICER GS15 U097U AREC EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS15 V001C DFA ASSISTANT PROCUREMENT ADMINISTRATOR GS15 A001C DFA ASSISTANT TAX RESEARCH ADMINISTRATOR GS14 A003C DFA REVENUE ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR GS14 A003N SENIOR INVESTMENT ANALYST GS14 A006N ATRS INTERNAL AUDITOR GS14 A009N ADE CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER GS14 A018C BANK CHIEF EXAMINER GS14 A030C BANK CERTIFIED EXAMINATIONS MANAGER GS14 A107C BANK EXAMINER MANAGER GS14 A128C INSURANCE CLAIMS DIR — PUBLIC EMPLOYEES GS14 A129C PSC QUALITY SERVICES DIRECTOR GS14 A130C PSC RATES & DEMAND RESOURCES DIRECTOR GS14 B002N ABA STATE ENGINEER GS14 B003N ABA STATE ARCHITECT GS14 G003C ANRC DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS14 G006N PSC CHIEF COUNSEL GS14 G007N DWS GENERAL COUNSEL GS14 G008N CHIEF PUBLIC DEFENDER GS14 G009N ADH CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL GS14 G010N WCC ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE GS14 G011N PSC ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE GS14 G018N DIRECTOR RISK MANAGEMENT GS14 G031N ASP GENERAL COUNSEL GS14 G032N PC&E HEARING OFFICER GS14 G033N AEDC AMS DIRECTOR GS14 G039N ADVA ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS14 G042N APERS CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL GS14 G047N OAL MARKETING & ADVERTISING DIR GS14 G057N OAL DIR SECURITY & COMPLIANCE GS14 G077C MLK EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS14 G257C BANK CHIEF COUNSEL GS14 G278C PSC RESEARCH & POLICY DIRECTOR GS14 G294C AEDC SENIOR COUNSEL GS14 L026N STATE VETERANS HOME ADMINISTRATOR GS14 N023N INSURANCE DEPUTY COMMISSIONER GS14 N043N PSC DIRECTOR OF FINANCIAL ANALYSIS GS14 N046N ADE ASST DIR ACADEMIC FACILITIES GS14 N048N ADC ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS14 N055N DHE ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR GS14 N059N AEDC TRAINING DIVISION DIRECTOR GS14 N063N ADH EPIDEMIOLOGY OFFICER GS14 N064N ADH CENTER DIR — LOCAL PUBLIC HEALTH GS14 N065N ADH CENTER DIRECTOR — HEALTH PROTECTION GS14 N066N ADFA DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS14 N069N ADE SPECIAL ADVISOR GS14 N071N PSC TAX DIVISION DIRECTOR GS14 N080N DHS/DMS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR — FISCAL GS14 N081N DHS DDS SUPT HDC/CONWAY GS14 N083N AEDC STRATEGIC PLANNING DIRECTOR GS14 N085N AEDC DIR TECH & ENTREPRENEURSHIP GS14 N086N DHS DDS DIR EVAL PLAN & MGMT SYSTEMS GS14 N092N ATRS ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR OF OPERATIONS GS14 N093N ATRS ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR FISCAL AFFAIRS GS14 N094N AEDC EPSCOR DIRECTOR GS14 N097N ADH CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER GS14 N099N DHS/DMS ADD — LONG TERM CARE GS14 N100N DHS/DMS ADD — MEDICAL SERVICES GS14 N101N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR PGM & ADMN SPT GS14 N102N DHS/DCO ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS14 N103N DHS MENTAL HEALTH CENTER DIRECTOR GS14 N114N DCC DEPUTY DIR RESIDENTIAL SVCS GS14 N121N DHS/DCFS DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS14 N122N DHS/DCC ASSISTANT DIR FINANCE & ADMIN GS14 N123N DHS/DBHS ASST DIR FOR FINANCE GS14 N124N DHS/DYS ASSISTANT DIVISION DIRECTOR GS14 N129N DCC DEPUTY DIR PAROLE/PROBATION SERVICES GS14 N130N DCC DEPUTY DIR ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES GS14 N133N DIRECTOR MINORITY HEALTH COMMISSION GS14 N134N DHS/DCFS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS14 N135N DHS AHC NURSING HOME ADMINISTRATOR GS14 N137N SECURITIES DEPUTY COMMISSIONER GS14 N140N INS ASST DEP COMMISSIONER FINANCE GS14 N142N DHS/DAAS DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS14 N144N DHS DDS DIR CLIENT SERVICES GS14 N150N TECHNICAL INSTITUTE DIRECTOR GS14 N177N AFHC DIRECTOR GS14 N180N AEDC ARKANSAS ENERGY OFFICE DIRECTOR GS14 N186N AEDC SENIOR MANAGER GS14 N190N INSURANCE GENERAL COUNSEL GS14 N199N OMIG DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR GS14 N223N ADPT PARKS DIV DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS14 N224N DIRECTORATE OF STATE RESOURCES DIRECTOR GS14 P077C DHS COMM & COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT OFF GS14 T001C ASP MAJOR GS14 X001C PSC DIR OF ELECTRIC UTILITIES SECT GS14 X002N PROPERTY & CASUALTY MANAGER GS14 A004N CERTIFIED FINANCIAL EXAMINER MANAGER GS13 A006C DFA REVENUE TAX DIVISION MANAGER GS13 A007N ASLA FEDERAL PROGRAMS FINANCIAL OFFICER GS13 A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II GS13 A010N AGRICULTURE CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER GS13 A011N ASP CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER GS13 A013N AETN DEP DIR FOR ADMIN & FINANCE GS13 A017N ADFA PUBLIC FINANCE OFFICER GS13 A023N MILITARY CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER GS13 A039C CERTIFIED BANK SENIOR EXAMINER GS13 A108C ADC ASST CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER (CFO) GS13 A126C ADVA CFO GS13 A127C DIS CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER GS13 A133C ADVA CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER GS13 B001C DEPUTY STATE FORESTER GS13 B004C ANRC WATER RESOURCES DIVISION MANAGER GS13 B005C ANRC WATER DEVELOPMENT DIVISION MANAGER GS13 B006C ANRC CONSERVATION DIVISION CHIEF GS13 B007C CRIME LAB SCIENTIFIC OPERATION MGR GS13 B007N AETN ENGINEERING DIVISION MANAGER GS13 B011N ADH DIR ENGINEERING GS13 B012C ADEQ ENGINEER P.E. BRANCH MANAGER GS13 B138C ADH ENGINEER CHIEF GS13 B139C AEDC DIRECTOR OF EPSCOR GS13 B140C AEDC MANUFACTURING SOLUTIONS DIRECTOR GS13 B141C ADEQ USED TIRE PROGRAM MANAGER GS13 D026N DHS ELIGIBILITY SYSTEM PROGRAM MANAGER GS13 E001N ADE COORDINATOR SPECIAL PROGRAMS GS13 E003N ADE COORD SCH. IMP / STANDARDS ASSURANCE GS13 E070C AETN SENIOR DIRECTOR OF CONTENT GS13 G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY GS13 G005C ADEQ WATER DIVISION MANAGER GS13 G012N PUBLIC DEFENDER III GS13 G014N ADC COMPLIANCE ATTORNEY GS13 G017N DWS ASST DIR — TANF GS13 G018C ADPT PARKS ADMIN MANAGER GS13 G019C GENERAL COUNSEL GS13 G019N PAROLE BOARD MEMBER GS13 G023C DEPUTY PROSECUTOR COORDINATOR GS13 G024N ADC GENERAL COUNSEL GS13 G034C ADEQ ASST AIR/WATER DIVISION MANAGER GS13 G037N APERS DIRECTOR OF OPERATIONS GS13 G041N ASPB GENERAL COUNSEL GS13 G043N RISK MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS13 G046N OAL SALES TRNG & RETAIL COORD GS13 G054N DHS GENERAL COUNSEL GS13 G055N EXECUTIVE ADMINISTRATOR GS13 G056C DHS/DCC ASST DIR OPS & PROG SUPV GS13 G225C DFA OCSE FIELD OPERATIONS MANAGER GS13 G234C DDSSA PROGRAM DIRECTOR GS13 G275C ADPT ADMINISTRATION MANAGER GS13 G276C DHS CHIEF OF STAFF GS13 G277C DHS PROCESS IMPROVEMENT DIRECTOR GS13 G290C ASST DEPUTY DIR OF LEGISLATIVE AFFAIRS GS13 M002C DHS BEHAV HLTH ASSOC DIR, AHC GS13 M003C DHS BEHAV HLTH CHILDRENS SYSTEM CARE DIR GS13 N001C DEPUTY CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER GS13 N049N DWS ASST DIR, INFO AND TECHNOLOGY GS13 N050N DWS ASST DIR, FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT GS13 N051N DWS ASST DIR, EMPLOYMENT ASSIST GS13 N054N DHE CAREER PATHWAYS DIRECTOR GS13 N058N DEPUTY DIRECTOR OF ARLPC GS13 N073N INSURANCE CHF FIN/MKT CONDUCT EXMR GS13 N074N DWS ASST DIR, UNEMPLOYMENT INS GS13 N078N DIS PROJECT & ENTERPRISE PROG MGMT ADMIN GS13 N079N DIS DIVISION DIRECTOR GS13 N090N CONTRACTORS LICENSE ADMR/INVEST GS13 N096N APERS ASST DIRECTOR OF FINANCE GS13 N098N ACTI DIRECTOR OF PHYSICAL THERAPY GS13 N104N ADH DIRECTOR STATISTICS & VITAL RECORDS GS13 N106N PRIVATE CAREER EDUCATION BOARD DIRECTOR GS13 N107N DHS/OFA ASSISTANT DIR — ACCOUNTING OPS GS13 N108N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR GS13 N109N DHS/OFA ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS13 N110N DHS ASST DIR CONTRACT MONITORING UNIT GS13 N111N DHS ASST DEP DIR FOR MGR ACCOUNTING GS13 N112N DHS ASST DEP DIR FIN SUPPORT SYSTEM GS13 N118N ADH DIR IN-HOME SERVICES GS13 N126N DHS DDS SUPT HDC GS13 N127N DHS/DBHS DIR ALCOHOL & DRUG ABUSE PREV GS13 N128N DHS ASST DIR QUALITY ASSURANCE GS13 N147N DHS/DAAS ASST DEP DIR GS13 N154N CLAIMS COMMISSION DIRECTOR GS13 N158N ASBN ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS13 N163N ADPT TOURISM ADMIN DIRECTOR GS13 N171N DHS DEP DIR OFFICE OF VOL SVCS GS13 N172N ACE REHAB OPERATIONS DIRECTOR GS13 N174N HEALTH INFORMATION TECH POLICY DIRECTOR GS13 N196N MILITARY AFFAIRS DIRECTOR GS13 N204N ADEQ DIRECTOR OF SPECIAL PROJECTS GS13 N205N ADEQ DIRECTOR OF COMPLIANCE GS13 N208N MEDICAL MARIJUANA COMM. DIRECTOR GS13 P002N ADH DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATIONS GS13 R001N ADH CHIEF HUMAN RESOURCES OFFICER GS13 R003N APERS DIRECTOR OF BENEFITS ADMIN GS13 R040C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM MANAGER GS13 T001N ADC SUPERINTENDENT GS13 T003C ASP CAPTAIN GS13 U017U ADPT HISTORY COMMISSION DIRECTOR GS13 U056U OIL & GAS DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS13 U080U ABA DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS13 U081U ARKANSAS SENTENCING COMMISSION DIRECTOR GS13 U093U CRIME LAB ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS13 V002N DHS DEP CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER GS13 X004C ADEQ AIR DIVISION MANAGER GS13 X008C SECURITIES CHIEF EXAMINER GS13 X197C RACING COMMISSION STEWARD GS13 A002N AEDC ASSISTANT DIRECTOR OF FINANCE GS12 A004C CERTIFIED FINANCIAL EXAMINER GS12 A013C PSC DIRECTOR OF REVENUE REQUIREMENTS GS12 A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER GS12 A014N OAL CONTROLLER GS12 A015C DWS DIR INTERNAL AUDIT & SECURITY GS12 A015N OAL TREASURER GS12 A016C DHS DMS BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER GS12 A021C AGENCY CONTROLLER I GS12 A025C DFA ACCOUNTING CAFR COORDINATOR GS12 A115C OMIG CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER GS12 A137C ADEQ FINANICAL MANAGER GS12 B002C AGRICULTURE DIRECTOR OF MARKETING GS12 B008N SENIOR PETROLEUM ENGINEER GS12 B012N AEDC ASSISTANT DIRECTOR OF ENGINEERING GS12 B013N ASST STATE GEOLOGIST GS12 B015C ENGINEER SUPERVISOR GS12 B015N AEDC ASSISTANT DIRECTOR OF RESEARCH GS12 B016N LAND SURVEY STATE SURVEYOR GS12 B018N AEDC FIELD ENGINEER GS12 B021N BIOSTATISTICIAN GS12 B142C ADEQ USED TIRE PROGRAM COORDINATOR GS12 D096C DIS EEF SR SYSTEM ADMINISTRATORS GS12 E009C TECHNICAL INSTITUTE ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS12 G002C DFA ASSISTANT IGS ADMINISTRATOR GS12 G006C ADE SPECIAL EDUCATION DIVISION MANAGER GS12 G010C ACE DIVISION MANAGER GS12 G012C ADE ASSISTANT TO DIRECTOR GS12 G013N ASBN GENERAL COUNSEL GS12 G014C AEDC DIR OF COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT GS12 G015C AEDC SMALL/MINORITY BUSINESS DIRECTOR GS12 G016N DWS ASST DIR GRANTS RESOURCE ADMIN GS12 G020C DWS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR GS12 G022N PUBLIC DEFENDER II GS12 G023N REVOCATION HEARING JUDGE GS12 G024C DEPARTMENT ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE GS12 G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR GS12 G026C ADH ASSOC CENTER DIR—MGMT & OPS GS12 G026N AEDC ASSISTANT DIRECTOR MGMT SVS GS12 G027C ADFA PROGRAM OFFICER GS12 G028C ADEQ TECHNICAL SERVICES DIVISION MANAGER GS12 G028N JDDC DEPUTY EXEC DIRECTOR GS12 G029C ADEQ SOLID WASTE DIVISION MANAGER GS12 G030C ADEQ REGULATED STORAGE TANKS DIV MANAGER GS12 G030N AEDC ASST DIR OF STEM EDUCATION GS12 G031C ADEQ PUBLIC OUTREACH DIVISION MANAGER GS12 G032C ADEQ MINING DIVISION MANAGER GS12 G033C ADEQ HAZARDOUS WASTE DIVISION MANAGER GS12 G034N AEDC ASST DIRECTOR SALES AND MARKETING GS12 G035C ADEQ ADMINISTRATION DIVISION MANAGER GS12 G035N AEDC SALES AND MARKETING SPECIALIST GS12 G036N PLANT BOARD ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS12 G037C ADPT PARKS PLANNING & DEV MGR GS12 G042C DHS ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE GS12 G049C ADH REGIONAL DIRECTOR GS12 G055C ADEM DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS12 G059C DDSSA ASST DIRECTOR GS12 G059N OAL SECURITY DEPUTY DIR GS12 G101C DHS AREA MANAGER GS12 G245C AEDC DIR OF COMMUNITY DEV & IMPROVEMENT GS12 G249C OMIG PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR GS12 G273C AEDC SENIOR PROJECT CONSULTANT GS12 G274C DHS VOLUNTEER SERVICES DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS12 G291C TRAFFIC SAFETY RESOURCE PROSECUTOR GS12 G292C DDSSA PROFESSIONAL RELATIONS MANAGER GS12 L019N ADH CHIEF EPIDEMIOLOGIST GS12 N095N ARKANSAS BUREAU OF STANDARDS DIRECTOR GS12 N105N STADIUM COMMISSION EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS12 N115N CRIMINAL INSURANCE FRAUD DIRECTOR GS12 N116N BOARD OF ARCHITECTS EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS12 N117N BD OF ACCT EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS12 N119N ADC INDUSTRY ADMINISTRATOR GS12 N120N ADC FARM ADMINISTRATOR GS12 N131N SBEC DIRECTOR GS12 N132N ENG & LAND SURVEYORS EXEC DIRECTOR GS12 N136N ADC HEALTH SERVICE ADMINISTRATOR GS12 N138N REHAB DIRECTOR FIELD SVCS GS12 N139N MINORITY HLTH & HLTH DISPARITIES DIR GS12 N141N DHS/DCO AREA DIRECTOR GS12 N143N DHS DDS DIVISION MANAGER GS12 N145N DHS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR CMS GS12 N146N BOARD OF APPRAISER EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS12 N148N ADH GOVERNMENTAL AFFAIRS POLICY DIR GS12 N151N DHS/DCFS ADMR ADMIN SERVICES GS12 N152N DHS/DBHS ASSISTANT DIR ADMIN SVCS GS12 N156N BEHAV HLTH ASST DIR CHILDRENS SVS GS12 N157N ATRS ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR OF INVESTMENTS GS12 N159N APERS INVESTMENT OPERATIONS MANAGER GS12 N161N STATE LIBRARY DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS12 N162N STATE DRUG PREVENTION DIRECTOR GS12 N165N LP GAS BOARD DIRECTOR GS12 N167N DHS POLICY & RESEARCH DIRECTOR GS12 N168N DHS DIR HOME & COMMUNITY BASED SVCS GS12 N170N REHAB DIRECTOR — ACTI GS12 P001N ADE DIR OF COMMUNICATIONS GS12 P003N ADC PUBLIC INFORMATION OFFICER GS12 P004N DHS DIRECTOR OF PUBLIC RELATIONS GS12 P007N DWS DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATIONS GS12 P078C ARS DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATION GS12 R002N DHS DIRECTOR OF HUMAN CAPITAL GS12 R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR GS12 S001C ADPT PARKS OPERATIONS MGR GS12 T005C ADC/DCC CORRECTIONAL WARDEN GS12 T007C ASP LIEUTENANT GS12 T109C SEX OFFENDER COMM NOTIFCTN ASESSMT ADMIN GS12 U006U EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SPINAL CORD COMM GS12 U021U AERONAUTICS DIRECTOR GS12 U088U LABOR DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS12 U099U DIRECTOR OF RURAL SERVICES GS12 V003C DFA PROCUREMENT DIVISION MANAGER GS12 V038C DIS IT PROCUREMENT ADMINISTRATOR GS12 X001N BD OF COLLECTION EXEC DIR GS12 X003C ASP/CACD CHIEF ADMINISTRATOR GS12 X005C PROPERTY & CASUALTY MANAGER GS12 A007C AUDIT MANAGER GS11 A019C PSC TAX DIVISION ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS11 A021N ADEQ CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER GS11 A024C DHS DIVISION CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER GS11 A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER GS11 A028C PSC SENIOR RATE CASE ANALYST GS11 A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER GS11 A033C TAX AUDITOR SUPERVISOR GS11 A110C SENIOR INVESTMENT MANAGER GS11 A112C DFA CAFR COORDINATOR GS11 A117C ACCREDITED FINANCIAL EXAMINER GS11 A119C CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT GS11 B009C DIRECTOR WATERWAYS COMMISSION GS11 B010C AGRI DIVISION MANAGER GS11 B014C ASST STATE FORESTER GS11 B014N SENIOR PETROLEUM GEOLOGIST GS11 B016C AEDC ASSISTANT DIRECTOR EPSCOR GS11 B019C FORENSIC ADMINISTRATOR GS11 B020C ADPT REGIONAL PARK SUPV GS11 B023C ENGINEER, P.E. GS11 B028C CLEST DEPUTY DIRECTOR STANDARDS DIVISION GS11 C002C ASP HIGHWAY SAFETY OFFICE ADMINISTRATOR GS11 D106C HEALTH INFO TECHNICAL SR SYS SPECIALIST GS11 E001C AETN PROGRAMMING DIVISION DIRECTOR GS11 E002C AETN OUTREACH DIVISION DIRECTOR GS11 E003C AETN EDUCATION DIVISION DIRECTOR GS11 E004C SCHOOL PRINCIPAL GS11 E006C PUBLIC SCHOOL PROGRAM MANAGER GS11 E006N ADE COORD COMPUTER SCIENCE GS11 E067C DDSSA PROGRAM EDUCATION COORDINATOR GS11 E069C ADE DIRECTOR OF MEDICAID IN THE SCHOOLS GS11 G007C WCC DIVISION MANAGER GS11 G008C RISK MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS11 G013C AEDC MANAGER OF STRATEGIC ENERGY DEV GS11 G021C DHS/DSB ASSISTANT DIRECTOR GS11 G022C DHS DIRECTOR OF EMERGENCY OPERATIONS GS11 G025N PUBLIC DEFENDER I GS11 G027N DHS RESEARCH ANALYSIS MANAGER GS11 G043C DHE FINANCIAL AID MANAGER GS11 G044C DFA REVENUE PROBLEM RESOLUTION OFFICER GS11 G044N OAL REGIONAL SALES MANAGER GS11 G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST GS11 G048C AEDC STRATEGIC PLANNING ASST DIR GS11 G052C ACIC DIVISION MANAGER GS11 G054C AREC DEPUTY EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR GS11 G058C DHE FEDERAL PROGRAM MANAGER GS11 G058N OAL KEY CHAIN ACCOUNT MANAGER GS11 G062C AEDC PROJECT CONSULTANT GS11 G066C PSC TELECOM AND QUALITY OF SERVICE MGR GS11 G067C PSC CUSTOMER SERVICE MANAGER GS11 G233C DDSSA SECTION MANAGER GS11 G247C ARKANSAS PAROLE BOARD PROGRAM ADMINISTRA GS11 G250C OMIG OPERATIONS MANAGER GS11 G255C DYS ACADEMIC ADMINISTRATOR GS11 G270C ATC DEPUTY DIRECTOR GS11 G271C DDSSA MEDICAL RELATIONS MANAGER GS11 G272C HSPA DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR GS11 L011C DHS ALCOHOL/DRUG ABUSE PREV ASST DEP DIR GS11 L013C ADH BRANCH MANAGER